Maine, session 132, LD1262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §8055, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1985, c. 506, Pt. A, §4, is further
amended to read:
3. Receipt of petition; judicial review. Within 60 days after receipt of a petition, the
agency shall either notify the petitioner in writing of its denial, stating the reasons therefor
for the denial, or initiate appropriate rule-making proceedings. Whenever a petition to
adopt or modify a rule is submitted by 150 or more registered voters of the State, the agency
shall initiate appropriate rulemaking rule-making proceedings within 60 days after receipt
of the petition. The petition must be verified and certified in the same manner provided in
Title 21‑A, section 354, subsection 7, prior to its presentation to the agency. If, within 60
days after receipt of a petition, the agency fails to notify the petitioner in writing of its
denial or to initiate appropriate rule-making proceedings, or if the agency has initiated rule-
making proceedings the petitioner believes to be inconsistent with the submitted petition,
the person that submitted the petition may seek appropriate judicial review of the agency's
actions consistent with section 8058 or, as applicable, subchapter 7.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §9051, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2005, c. 61, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Adjudicatory proceeding. In any adjudicatory proceedings, except including those
proceedings initiated pursuant to section 9051-B, but excluding those proceedings
involving correctional facilities, the Workers' Compensation Board, the Maine Motor
Vehicle Franchise Board or the State Parole Board, the procedures of this subchapter apply.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §9051-B is enacted to read:
§9051-B. Proceeding to enforce certain existing laws or rules
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and in accordance with the
provisions of this section and this subchapter, a person may petition an agency or the
Attorney General, as applicable, to enforce an existing law or rule relating to regulation of
the environment, natural resources, public health or safety or freedom of information and
government transparency.
1. Form; content. Each agency and the Attorney General shall designate the form for
petitions under this section and the procedure for their submission, consideration and
disposition. A petition submitted by a person under this section must, at a minimum,
provide sufficient information for the agency or the Attorney General to identify the
existing law or rule the person is seeking enforcement of and the purposes for which the
person is seeking that enforcement.
2. Receipt of petition; judicial review. Within 60 days after receipt of a petition, the
agency or the Attorney General shall either notify the petitioner in writing of its denial,
stating the reasons for the denial, or initiate an appropriate proceeding to enforce an existing
law or rule as specified in the petition. If, within 60 days after receipt of a petition, the
agency or the Attorney General fails to notify the petitioner in writing of its denial or to
initiate appropriate proceedings, or if the agency or the Attorney General has initiated a
proceeding the petitioner believes to be inconsistent with the submitted petition, the person
that submitted the petition may seek appropriate judicial review of the agency's or Attorney
General's actions consistent with subchapter 7, as applicable.
Page 1 - 132LR0879(01)

Sec. 4. 5 MRSA c. 375, sub-c. 8 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 8
FUND FOR ADMINISTRATIVE OVERSIGHT
§11021. Fund for Administrative Oversight established; administration
This section establishes and governs the administration of the Fund for Administrative
Oversight.
1. Fund established; sources of fund. The Fund for Administrative Oversight,
referred to in this section as "the fund," is established within the Office of the Attorney
General as a nonlapsing, dedicated fund, to be administered by the administrator, for the
purposes described in subsection 3. The fund may accept revenue from grants, bequests,
gifts or contributions from any source, public or private, including any sums that may be
directed by law or appropriated by the Legislature, transferred to the fund from time to time
by the State Controller or dedicated to the fund.
2. Fund administrator. The fund is administered by a fund administrator, referred to
in this section as "the administrator," who is appointed by the Governor for a 4-year term
and may be reappointed by the Governor to additional 4-year terms.
3. Fund purposes. Revenue credited to the fund is distributed in the manner described
in subsection 4 for the following purposes:
A. To support actions by persons seeking to petition or that have petitioned an agency
for adoption or modification of rules pursuant to section 8055, including persons
seeking judicial review of an agency's actions in response to a petition;
B. To support actions by persons seeking to petition or that have petitioned an agency
or the Attorney General to initiate a proceeding to enforce an existing law or rule
pursuant to section 9051-B, including a person seeking judicial review of an agency or
the Attorney General's actions in response to a petition; and
C. To support actions by persons seeking to intervene or otherwise participate in
agency rulemaking conducted under subchapter 2 or 2-A, in an adjudicatory
proceeding under subchapter 4 or in a licensing action under subchapter 5, including
intervention or participation in a judicial review of any such agency actions, for which
the intervention or participation is authorized by law or rule.
4. Distribution of funds. After administrative costs, including any salary expenses
due to the administrator and other staffing and administrative costs associated with the
administration of the fund, revenue credited to the fund must be distributed as follows.
A. Annually, the administrator shall assess the amount of revenue within the fund that
is available for distribution during the next calendar year for the purposes identified in
subsection 3 and shall establish a formula to determine the amount of that identified
revenue that will be made available to each agency and to the Attorney General for
distribution. The administrator shall notify each agency and the Attorney General
regarding the total funding amount that will be made available to the agency or the
Attorney General from the fund in the next calendar year.
Page 2 - 132LR0879(01)

B. Each agency and the Attorney General may request a distribution of revenue from
the fund up to the total funding amount to support the purposes identified in subsection
3. In reviewing such requests for distribution, the administrator shall ensure that
funding priority is given to support actions by persons:
(1) That are not commercial entities or entities that are otherwise subject to
regulation under law or rule;
(2) Whose interest or position, as determined by the administrator, is not otherwise
adequately represented in the rulemaking, proceeding or licensing action; and
(3) Whose interest or position, as determined by the administrator, is primarily
focused on protecting or conserving the State's natural resources or environment,
protecting the public health or safety or ensuring freedom of access to public
information and government transparency.
C. In collaboration with each agency and the Attorney General, the administrator shall
develop and implement measures to educate members of the public and organizations
regarding the availability of revenue from the fund to support the purposes identified
in subsection 3.
Sec. 5. Office of Attorney General; report. The Office of the Attorney General
shall consult with each state agency that issues licenses, permits or other approvals to
persons to engage in regulated activities relating to the environment, natural resources,
public health and safety and freedom of information and government transparency to
identify a mechanism for imposing an additional fee amount for the issuance of those
licenses, permits or approvals to support activities authorized under the Fund for
Administrative Oversight, established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section
11021, in a manner designed to satisfy the anticipated annual demand for distributions from
that fund for the agency. The fee amounts identified must be reasonable, must not
unreasonably impede the activities of the regulated entity and must be designed to reflect
the anticipated cost to the agency of oversight of the regulated activity and addressing any
potential violations by the regulated entity, including any costs of corrective action or
remediation undertaken by the agency. By January 1, 2026, the office shall submit a report
to the Joint Standing Committee on State and Local Government outlining its
recommendations for imposing such additional fee amounts, including necessary proposed
legislation. The recommendations and proposed legislation must be designed to provide for
assessment and collection of the additional fee amounts beginning July 1, 2026 and must
provide that of those fee amounts collected, 1/2 must be retained by the state agency
assessing the fee to support its oversight and enforcement activities and 1/2 must be
transferred to the Fund for Administrative Oversight to support activities under that fund.
After reviewing the report, the committee may report out legislation relating to the report
to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.